Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6732
Contested actions; procedure.

Except as provided by section 71-6731, an applicant or registrant who desires to contest an action or to further contest an affirmed or modified action shall do so in the manner provided in the Administrative Procedure Act for contested cases. The chief medical officer as designated in section 81-3115 shall be the decisionmaker in a contested case under this section. The hearings on a petition for judicial review of any final decision regarding an action for an alleged violation shall be set for hearing at the earliest possible date. The times for pleadings and hearings in such action shall be set by the judge of the court with the object of securing a decision at the earliest possible time.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 22;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 666.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.